Delaware, session 153, HB54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 62, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6203. Office of Suicide Prevention. (a) The Office of Suicide Prevention is established under the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health. (b) For purposes of this section: (1) âDivisionâ means âDivision of Substance Abuse and Mental Health.â (2) âOfficeâ means âOffice of Suicide Prevention.â (c) The Office is established to address suicide prevention and to do all of the following: (1) Serve in coordination with the Department of Services for Children, Youth and their Families as a place to reach all suicide prevention resources in the State. (2) Assist the suicide prevention coalition in its mission. (3) Provide suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention vision and guidance to stakeholders throughout the State. (4) Work with community level prevention organizations to promote best practices in suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention. (5) Oversee suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention funding application processes and seek grant funds to further suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention . (6) Prepare an annual report for the General Assembly and Governor that outlines the work of the Office and progress made towards suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention . The first report is due on October 15, 2026. (7) Create the Stateâs Suicide Prevention Plan, referenced in Â§ 6201 of this title, with approval of the suicide prevention coalition, on or before January 1, 2026. (8) Update the Stateâs Suicide Prevention Plan no fewer than every three years. (d) The Office will be led by a Director, who shall report to the Director of the Division. Additional employees may be hired consistent with recommendations of the Division and available funding.